California, session 20252026, AB6.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17921.12 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:17921.12. (a) No later than December 31, 2026, the Department of Housing and Community Development shall convene a working group, with membership including, but not limited to, the California Building Standards Commission, State Fire Marshal, Division of the State Architect, Energy Commission, and other stakeholders, to research and consider identifying and recommending amendments to state building standards allowing residential developments of between 3 and 10 units to be built under the requirements of the California Residential Code (Part 2.5 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), and any necessary modifications to maintain health and safety standards for the developments. Each entity shall provide input relative to its area of expertise and oversight.(b) No later than December 31, 2027, 2028, the department shall provide a one-time report of its findings to the Legislature in the annual report required by Section 50408.(c) (1) If the working group identifies and recommends amendments to building standards in the report described in subdivision (b), the Department of Housing and Community Development and other state agencies within the working group with authority to propose adoption of building standards shall research, develop, and consider proposing for adoption by the California Building Standards Commission such standards for the next triennial update of the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations) that occurs on or after January 1,						2027. 2031.(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, the Department of Housing and Community Development may exceed the scope and application of the International Residential Code as referenced in Section 17922 to allow residential developments of between 3 and 10 units to be designed and constructed under the requirements of the California Residential Code (Part 2.5 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(d) (1) This section does not limit the application of the California Electrical Code (Part 3 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), the California Mechanical Code (Part 4 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), the California Plumbing Code (Part 5 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), and the California Energy Code (Part 6 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations) to residential occupancies of any size.(2) This section does not authorize the working group to propose the expansion of the California Residential Code to include chapters in the International Residential Code that were not adopted in the 2025 edition of the California Residential Code due to duplication with other parts of the California Building Standards Code.SEC. 2. Section 17921.13 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:17921.13. (a) No later than December 31, 2026, the Department of Housing and Community Development shall perform a review of construction cost pressures for single-family and multifamily residential construction as a result of new or existing building standards requirements in the California Buildings Standards Code and provide a one-time report of its findings to the Legislature in the annual report required by Section 50408.(b) Commencing with the next triennial update of the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations) that occurs on or after January 1, 2027, 2031, and every three years thereafter, the Department of Housing and Community Development shall perform a review as described in subdivision (a) to revise or update standards, as needed, with a goal of reducing by 30 percent the cost of construction for new residential development.